Hawaii statutes.
§291E-15 Refusal to submit to breath,
blood, or urine test; subject to administrative revocation proceedings. If
a person under arrest refuses to submit to a breath, blood, or urine test, none
shall be given, except as provided in section 291E-21. Upon the law
enforcement officer's determination that the person under arrest has refused to
submit to a breath, blood, or urine test, if applicable, then a law enforcement
officer shall:

(1) Inform the person under arrest of the sanctions
under section 291E-41 or 291E-65; and

(2) Ask the person if the person still refuses to
submit to a breath, blood, or urine test, thereby subjecting the person to the
procedures and sanctions under part III or section 291E-65, as applicable;

provided that if the law enforcement officer fails
to comply with paragraphs (1) and (2), the person shall not be subject to the
refusal sanctions under part III or IV. [L 2000, c 189, pt of §23; am L 2006, c
64, §2; am L 2009, c 88, §§4, 17(1); am L 2010, c 166, §10; am L 2016, c 17, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next